Illinois, session 104th, HB2724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 5Amusement Wagering Prohibition Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities, 8including, but not limited to, newspaper, radio, Internet and 9electronic media, and television advertising, the distribution 10of fliers and circulars, billboard advertising, and the 11display of window and interior signs.12    "Amusement device" means a game or machine which a person 13activates by inserting or using currency or a coin, card, 14coupon, slug, token, or similar device, and the person playing 15or operating the game or machine impacts the outcome of the 16game. "Amusement device" includes games of skill, games of 17chance, and games of a combination of skill and chance. 18"Amusement device" does not include a device certified by the 19Illinois Gaming Board to be operated by an Illinois Gaming 20Board licensee.21    "Crane game" means an amusement device involving skill, if 22it rewards the player exclusively with merchandise contained 23within the amusement device proper and limited to toys,   HB2724 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1novelties, and prizes other than currency, each having a 2wholesale value which is not more than $25.3    "Facilitate" means the aiding, abetting, assisting, 4inciting, or inducing the wagering on the outcome of any game 5or contest on any amusement devices by any person.6    "Family amusement establishment" means a place of business 7with amusement devices on the premises.8    "Merchandise" means noncash prizes maintained on the 9premises by the family amusement establishment, including toys 10and novelties. "Merchandise" does not include any prize or 11other item, if the exchange or conversion to cash or a cash 12equivalent is facilitated or permitted by the family amusement 13establishment.14    "Redemption machine" means a single-player or multi-player 15amusement device involving a game, the object of which is 16throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, placing, or propelling a 17ball or other object that is either physical or computer 18generated on a display or with lights into, upon, or against a 19hole or other target that is either physical or computer 20generated on a display or with lights, or stopping, by 21physical, mechanical, or electronic means, a moving object 22that is either physical or computer generated on a display or 23with lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 24is either physical or computer generated on a display or with 25lights, if all of the following conditions are met:26        (1) The outcome of the game is predominantly   HB2724 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    determined by the skill of the player.2        (2) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 3    player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 4    upon the player's score.5        (3) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.6        (4) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu of 7    tickets or tokens for single play of the device does not 8    exceed $25.9        (5) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and other 10    representations of value, which may be accumulated by 11    players to redeem prizes of greater value, for a single 12    play of the device does not exceed $25.13    "Wager" means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an 14uncertain outcome. 15    Section 10. Wagering facilitation prohibited. No owner or 16operator of a family amusement establishment shall facilitate 17wagering on amusement devices. Facilitating wagering on 18amusement devices includes, but is not limited to, taking any 19action that knowingly allows any entity to facilitate wagering 20on amusement devices on the family amusement establishment's 21premises. 22    Section 15. Wagering advertising prohibited. No owner or 23operator of a family amusement establishment shall engage in 24advertising that promotes wagering on amusement devices.   HB2724 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    Section 20. Exemptions. Nothing in this Act shall prohibit 2a family amusement establishment from offering:3        (1) a coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 4    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 5    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 6    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 7    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 8    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 9    property, or right to receive money or property;10        (2) a vending machine by which full and adequate 11    return is made for the money invested and in which there is 12    no element of chance or hazard;13        (3) a crane game;14        (4) a redemption machine; or15        (5) a bona fide game or contest where the participants 16    pay a fixed entry fee to enter and engage in a game or 17    contest at a scheduled date and time that predominantly 18    involves skill, speed, accuracy, strength, or endurance of 19    the persons entering and participating in the game or 20    contest and one or more of the participants may win a 21    prize, award, or compensation to be paid from the entry 22    fees collected to the actual contestants in the game or 23    contest. 24    Section 25. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by   HB2724 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1changing Sections 28-1 and 28-1.1 as follows: 2    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)3    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 4    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:5        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 6    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 7    subsection (b) of this Section;8        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 9    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment, 10    or election;11        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 12    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 13    manufactures, or distributes any gambling device;14        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 15    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 16    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 17    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 18    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 19    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 20    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 21    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 22    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 23    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 24    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement, or guarantee, by or 25    through a person registered with the Secretary of State   HB2724 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 2    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 3    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 4    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 5    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 6    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 7    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 8    of this paragraph (4);9        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument, 10    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 11    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 12    money which he has received in the course of a bet or 13    wager;14        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 15    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 16    appointment, or election;17        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 18    sells, offers to sell, or transfers any ticket or share 19    for any lottery;20        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 21    sells, offers to sell, or knowingly possesses or transfers 22    any policy ticket, slip, record, document, or other 23    similar device;24        (9) knowingly drafts, prints, or publishes any lottery 25    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 26    document, or similar device, except for such activity   HB2724 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    related to lotteries, bingo games, and raffles authorized 2    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 3    or any other state or foreign government;4        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 5    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo 6    games, and raffles authorized by and conducted in 7    accordance with the laws of Illinois or any other state;8        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 9    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 10    telegraph, radio, semaphore, or similar means; or 11    knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the 12    transmission or receipt of such information; except that 13    nothing in this subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or 14    receipt of such information for use in news reporting of 15    sporting events or contests; or16        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 17    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 18    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 19    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 20    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 21    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 22    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 23    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section; or . 24        (13) knowingly facilitates wagering on amusement 25    devices or knowingly engages in advertising that promotes 26    wagering on amusement devices in violation of the Family   HB2724 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    Amusement Wagering Prohibition Act. 2    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 3not be convicted of gambling:4        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 5    happening of chance including without limitation contracts 6    of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or accident 7    insurance.8        (2) Unless prohibited by the Family Amusement Wagering 9    Prohibition Act, offers Offers of prizes, award, or 10    compensation to the actual contestants in any bona fide 11    contest for the determination of skill, speed, strength, 12    or endurance or to the owners of animals or vehicles 13    entered in such contest.14        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 15    this State.16        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 17    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 18    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 19    commerce to any place outside this State when such 20    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 21    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 22    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 23    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 24    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.25        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 26    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.  HB2724 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 2    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 3    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 4    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 5    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.6        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 7    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 8    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 9    Illinois Lottery Law. 10        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 11    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 12    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 13    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 14    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.15        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 16    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.17        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 18    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 19    Act. 20        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 21    the Charitable Games Act.22        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 23    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.24        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 25    Gambling Act.26        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed   HB2724 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 2    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 3    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 4    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 5        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 6    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 7    required to participate. 8        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 9    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 10    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 11    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 12    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 13    U.S.C. 1463). 14        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 15    the Sports Wagering Act. 16    (c) Sentence.17    Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or subsequent 18conviction under subsections (a)(3) through (a)(12), is a 19Class 4 felony.20    (d) Circumstantial evidence.21    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 22shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 23prosecution.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 256-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 26101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB2724 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    (720 ILCS 5/28-1.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1.1)2    Sec. 28-1.1. Syndicated gambling. 3    (a) Declaration of Purpose. Recognizing the close 4relationship between professional gambling and other organized 5crime, it is declared to be the policy of the legislature to 6restrain persons from engaging in the business of gambling for 7profit in this State. This Section shall be liberally 8construed and administered with a view to carrying out this 9policy.10    (b) A person commits syndicated gambling when he or she 11operates a "policy game" or engages in the business of 12bookmaking.13    (c) A person "operates a policy game" when he or she 14knowingly uses any premises or property for the purpose of 15receiving or knowingly does receive from what is commonly 16called "policy":17        (1) money from a person other than the bettor or 18    player whose bets or plays are represented by the money; 19    or20        (2) written "policy game" records, made or used over 21    any period of time, from a person other than the bettor or 22    player whose bets or plays are represented by the written 23    record.24    (d) A person engages in bookmaking when he or she 25knowingly receives or accepts more than 5 five bets or wagers   HB2724 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1upon the result of any trials or contests of skill, speed, or 2power of endurance or upon any lot, chance, casualty, unknown, 3or contingent event whatsoever, which bets or wagers shall be 4of such size that the total of the amounts of money paid or 5promised to be paid to the bookmaker on account thereof shall 6exceed $2,000. Bookmaking is the receiving or accepting of 7bets or wagers regardless of the form or manner in which the 8bookmaker records them.9    (e) Participants in any of the following activities shall 10not be convicted of syndicated gambling:11        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 12    happening of chance, including, without limitation, 13    contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or 14    accident insurance;15        (2) Offers of prizes, award, or compensation to the 16    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 17    determination of skill, speed, strength, or endurance or 18    to the owners of animals or vehicles entered in the 19    contest, except as prohibited under the Family Amusement 20    Wagering Prohibition Act;21        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by law of this 22    State; 23        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 24    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 25    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 26    commerce to any place outside this State when the   HB2724 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 12064 LNS 22159 b1    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 2    law;3        (5) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 4    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act;5        (6) Gambling games conducted on riverboats, in 6    casinos, or at organization gaming facilities when 7    authorized by the Illinois Gambling Act;8        (7) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 9    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 10    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 11    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 12    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act; and13        (8) Savings promotion raffles authorized under Section 14    5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of the 15    Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 16    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 17    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 18    U.S.C. 1463). 19    (f) Sentence. Syndicated gambling is a Class 3 felony.20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.